Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4513
Bridge to independence program; Nebraska Children's Commission; duties; report; contents.

The Nebraska Children's Commission shall advise and make recommendations to the Legislature regarding ongoing implementation of the bridge to independence program, extended guardianship assistance described in section 43-4511, and extended adoption assistance described in section 43-4512. The commission shall provide a written report regarding ongoing implementation, including participation in the bridge to independence program, extended guardianship assistance described in section 43-4511, and extended adoption assistance described in section 43-4512 and early discharge rates and reasons obtained from the department, to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature, the department, and the Governor by September 1 of each year. The report to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2013, LB216, § 13;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 43;

Laws 2015, LB243, § 23;

Laws 2018, LB732, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB600, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 28;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 23.
July 1, 2026